Hawaii statutes.
§554G-8 Avoidance of permitted transfers in
trust. (a) No claim, including an action to enforce a judgment entered by
a court or other body having adjudicative authority, by a creditor against
property that is subject to a permitted transfer that arises after a permitted
transfer and no claim by a creditor to avoid a permitted transfer shall be
brought at law or in equity for attachment or other provisional remedy unless
the permitted transfer was made with actual intent to defraud, hinder, or delay
the creditor.

(b) An allowable claim under subsection (a)
shall be extinguished unless:

(1) The creditor's claim arose before the permitted
transfer was made and the action is brought within the limitations of section
651C-9 on the latter of the date of the permitted transfer or July 1, 2010; or

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 651C‑9,
the creditor's claim arose concurrent with or subsequent to the permitted
transfer, and the action is brought within two years after the permitted
transfer is made.

(c) In any action described in subsection (a),
the burden to prove intent to defraud, hinder, or delay by clear and convincing
evidence shall be upon the creditor.

(d) For purposes of this section, a permitted
transfer that is made by a transferor who is a trustee shall be deemed to have
been made as of the date that the property that is the subject of the permitted
transfer was originally transferred via a trust instrument that meets the
requirements of this chapter to the transferor or the transferor's predecessor
in interest.

(e) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a
creditor or other person who purports to have a claim against property that is
the subject of a permitted transfer shall have only the rights, with respect to
a permitted transfer, as are provided in this section and sections 554G-9 and
554G-10.

(f) No creditor or any other person shall have
any claim or cause of action, including an action to enforce a judgment entered
by a court or other body having adjudicative authority, against a trustee or
advisor described in section 554G-4.5(a) or against any person involved in
drafting, preparing, executing, or funding a trust or in counseling the parties
to a trust that is the subject of a permitted transfer if, as of the date the action
is brought, an action with respect to the permitted transfer would be barred
under this section. [L 2010, c 182, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 161, §8]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next